test/tools/fsmbook-tests/lexc-files/EsperantoNounsAdjectivesAndVerbs.lexc
Multichar_Symbols +Noun +Adj +NSuff +ASuff +Nize
		  +Pl +Sg +Acc MF+
		  +Aug +Dim +Fem Op+ Neg+
		  +Verb +Cont +Inf +Pres +Past +Fut +Cond +Subj

LEXICON Root
	Nouns ;
	Adjectives ;
	Verbs ;

LEXICON Nouns
	NounRoots ;
MF+:ge	NounRoots;

LEXICON NounRoots
bird	Nmf ;
hund	Nmf ;
kat	Nmf ;
elefant	Nmf ;

LEXICON Nmf
+Noun:0	AugDimFem ;

LEXICON AugDimFem
+Fem:in	AugDimFem ;
+Dim:et	AugDimFem ;
+Aug:eg	AugDimFem ;
	Nend ;
	Adjend ;

LEXICON Nend
+NSuff:o	Number ;

LEXICON Adjectives
	AdjPrefixes ;
	AdjRoots ;

LEXICON AdjPrefixes
Op+:mal	AdjRoots ;
Neg+:ne	AdjRoots ;

LEXICON AdjRoots
bon	Adj ;
long	Adj ;
jun	Adj ;
alt	Adj ;
grav	Adj ;

LEXICON Adj
+Adj:0	AugDimNize ;

LEXICON AugDimNize
+Aug:eg AugDimNize ;
+Dim:et AugDimNize ;
	Adjend ;
+Nize:ec       Nend ;

LEXICON Adjend
+ASuff:a	Number ;

LEXICON Number
+Pl:j	Case ;
+Sg:0	Case ;

LEXICON Case
+Acc:n	# ;
	# ;

LEXICON Verbs
	VerbPrefixes ;
	VerbRoots ;

LEXICON VerbPrefixes
Op+:mal	VerbRoots ;
Neg+:ne	VerbRoots ;

LEXICON VerbRoots
don	V ;
est	V ;
pens	V ;
dir	V ;
fal	V ;

LEXICON V
+Verb:0	Aspect ;

LEXICON Aspect
+Cont:ad	Vend ;
		Vend ;

LEXICON Vend
+Inf:i	# ;
+Pres:as	# ;
+Past:is	# ;
+Fut:os	# ;
+Cond:us	# ;
+Subj:u	# ;
